src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
! +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#duháh%>a K ;
! +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#duhát NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
! +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#duháh%>is K ;
! +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e%>X4#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
! +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#duháh%>at K ;
! +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#duháh%>ij K ;
! +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
! +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Ill:i%>X5jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
! +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
! +Num+Pl+Com:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
! +Num+Pl+Com:i%>X5jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
!
!LEXICON GOLBMADUHAT   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
! +Num+Sg+Nom:#duhát K ;
! +Num+Ess:%>n#duháh%>in K ;
! +Num+Sg+Acc:#duháh%>a K ;
! +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#duháh%>a K ;
! +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#duhát K ;
! +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#duhát NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
! +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#duháh%>is K ;
! +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
! +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#duháh%>at K ;
! +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#duháh%>ij K ;
! +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
! +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
! +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
! +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
! +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
!
!LEXICON VIHTTADUHAT   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
! +Num+Sg+Nom:htta#duhát K ;
! +Num+Ess:htta%>n#duháh%>in K ;
! +Num+Sg+Acc:htta#duháh%>a K ;
! +Num+Sg+Gen:đa#duháh%>a K ;
! +Num+Sg+Gen:đa#duhát K ;
! +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#duhát NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
! +Num+Sg+Loc:đa#duháh%>is K ;
! +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:đa#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
! +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#duháh%>at K ;
! +Num+Sg+Ill:đa#duháh%>ij K ;
! +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
! +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Ill:đa%>jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
! +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
! +Num+Pl+Com:đa%>jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
! +Num+Pl+Com:đa%>jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
!
!LEXICON CIEZADUHAT   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
! +Num+Sg+Nom:eža#duhát K ;
! +Num+Sg+Nom:ehča#duhát K ;
! +Num+Ess:ehča%>n#duháh%>in K ;
! +Num+Sg+Acc:eža#duháh%>a K ;
! +Num+Sg+Gen:eža#duháh%>a K ;
! +Num+Sg+Gen:eža#duhát K ;
! +Num+Cmp/SgGen:eža#duhát NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
! +Num+Sg+Loc:eža#duháh%>is K ;
! +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:eža#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
! +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#duháh%>at K ;
! +Num+Sg+Ill:eža#duháh%>ij K ;
! +Num+Sg+Com:eža%>jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
! +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:eža%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Ill:eža%>jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
! +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
! +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
! +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
!
!LEXICON GAVCCIDUHAT   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
! +Num+Sg+Nom:#duhát K ;
! +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#duhát K ;
! +Num+Ess:%>n#duháh%>in K ;
! +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#duháh%>a K ;
! +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#duhát K ;
! +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#duháh%>a K ;
! +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#duhát NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
! +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#duháh%>is K ;
! +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
! +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#duháh%>at K ;
! +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#duháh%>ij K ;
! +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
! +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
! +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
! +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
! +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
! +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
!
!
!
!LEXICON CIEZAS   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  Collective numerals
! +N+Coll+Sg+Gen:a K ;
! +N+Coll+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: K ;  !
! +N+Coll+Sg+Acc:a K ;
! +N+Coll+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc: K ;  !
! +N+Coll+Pl+Nom:at K ;
! +N+Coll+Sg+Ill:ij K ;
! +N+Coll+Sg+Loc:is K ;
! +N+Coll+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:in K ;  ! !SOUTH
! +N+Coll+Sg+Com:ijn K ;
! +N+Coll+Pl+Gen:iX5jd K ;
! +N+Coll+Pl+Acc:iX5jd K ;
! +N+Coll+Pl+Ill:ijdda K ;
! +N+Coll+Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
! +N+Coll+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:ijs K ;  ! !SOUTH
! +N+Coll+Pl+Com:ijgujn K ;
! +Sg+Nom: PxC ;
! +CmpN/SgG:a R ;  !compound also for these
! +CmpN/SgG: R ;  !compound also for these
! +Sg+Gen: PxC ;
! +Sg+Acc: PxC ;
! +Sg+Ill:asa%> PxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Nom:ijddá%> Px1V ;
! +Sg+Loc:istti%> PxVvowch ;
! +Sg+Com:ijnni%> PxVvowch ;
!! +Pl+Nom:ijddi%> PxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Gen:ijddi%> PxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Acc:ijddi%> PxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Ill:ijddás%> PxC ;
! +Pl+Loc:ijnni%> PxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Com:ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
!
!
!LEXICON VIDAS   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  Collective numerals
! +N+Coll+Sg+Nom:đas K ;
! +N+Coll+Ess:đas%>in K ;
! +N+Coll+Sg+Gen:httas%>a K ;
! +N+Coll+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:httas K ;  !
! +N+Coll+Sg+Acc:httas%>a K ;
! +N+Coll+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:httas K ;  !
! +N+Coll+Pl+Nom:httas%>at K ;
! +N+Coll+Sg+Ill:httas%>ij K ;
! +N+Coll+Sg+Loc:httas%>is K ;
! +N+Coll+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:httas%>in K ;  ! !SOUTH
! +N+Coll+Sg+Com:httas%>ijn K ;
! +N+Coll+Pl+Gen:httas%>iX5jd K ;
! +N+Coll+Pl+Acc:httas%>iX5jd K ;
! +N+Coll+Pl+Ill:httas%>ijdda K ;
! +N+Coll+Pl+Loc:httas%>ijn K ;
! +N+Coll+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:httas%>ijs K ;  ! !SOUTH
! +N+Coll+Pl+Com:httas%>ijgujn K ;
! +Sg+Nom:httas%> PxC ;
! +CmpN/SgG:httas%>a R ;  !compound also for these
! +CmpN/SgG:httas%> R ;  !compound also for these
! +Sg+Gen:httas%> PxC ;
! +Sg+Acc:httas%> PxC ;
! +Sg+Ill:httas%>asa PxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Nom:httas%>ijddá%> Px1V ;
! +Sg+Loc:httas%>istti%> PxVvowch ;
! +Sg+Com:httas%>ijnni%> PxVvowch ;
!! +Pl+Nom:httas%>ijddi%> PxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Gen:httas%>ijddi%> PxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Acc:httas%>ijddi%> PxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Ill:httas%>ijddás%> PxC ;
! +Pl+Loc:httas%>ijnni%> PxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Com:httas%>ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
!
!
!LEXICON BEANNOT   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ one and a half
!+Ess:nubbi%>n K ;
!+Sg+Gen:nubbi%>X4 K ;
!+Sg+Ill+Attr:nubbi%>X4 K ;
!+Sg+Loc+Attr:nubbi%>X4 K ;
!  :nubbi%>X4X7# NAMAT ;
!+Sg+Acc:nubbi%>X4 K ;
!+Sg+Ill:nubbi%>X3j K ;
!+Sg+Loc:nubbi%>X4s K ;
!+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth+Use/NG:nubbi%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
!+Sg+Com:nubbi%>X5jn K ;
!+Pl+Nom:nubbi%>X4t K ;
!+Pl+Gen:nubbi%>X5jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Com+Attr:nubbi%>X5jd9 K ;
!!+Pl+Gen:nubbi%>X5jd9# NAMAT ;
!+Pl+Acc:nubbi%>X5jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Ill:nubbi%>X5jde K ;
!+Pl+Loc:nubbi%>X5jn K ;
!+Pl+Com:nubbi%>X5jgujn K ;
!
!
!LEXICON yeartag
! +Num+Sem/Year: dateyearcase ;
!
!LEXICON yeartagpl
!          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Nom:    # ;
!          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Gen:    # ;
!          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Acc:    # ;
! +Num+Sem/Year+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc:%:s # ;
!
!LEXICON dateyearcase
!          +Sg+Nom:     #      ;
!          +Sg+Gen:     #      ;
!          +Sg+Acc:     #      ;
! +Err/Orth+Sg+Acc:%:a  #      ;
! +Err/Orth+Sg+Gen:%:a  #      ;
!          +Sg+Loc:%:s  #      ;
! +Err/Orth+Sg+Loc:s    #      ;
! +Err/Orth+Sg+Loc:%:is #      ;
! +Err/Orth+Sg+Loc:is #      ;
! +Err/Orth+Sg+Loc:%:as #      ;
!          +Sg+Ill:%:i  #      ;
! +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:i    #      ;
! +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:%:ii #      ;
!     +Sg+Ill+Attr:     #      ;
!     +Sg+Loc+Attr:     #      ;
!      +Cmp/SplitR:%-   ENDLEX ;
!      +Cmp/SplitR:%–   ENDLEX ;
!
!
!LEXICON ARABICCASES   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  to distinguish between 0 and oblique
!ARABICCASE0 ;
!ARABICCASE ;
!
!LEXICON ARABICCASE0   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
!      +Arab+Sg+Nom:     MARKDOT ;
!      +Arab+Sg+Gen:     MARKDOT ;
!      +Arab+Sg+Acc:     MARKDOT ;
! +Arab+Sg+Ill+Attr:     #       ;
! +Arab+Sg+Loc+Attr:     #       ;
!  +Arab+Cmp/SplitR:%:%- ENDLEX  ;
!  +Arab+Cmp/SplitR:%:%– ENDLEX  ;
!
!
!LEXICON ARABICCASE   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
!!   +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:   # ;
!!     f+Nom+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:f  # ; ! s. 123f.
!!    ff+Nom+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:ff # ; ! s. 123ff.
!!  b+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:b  # ; ! § 123b
!!  c+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:c  # ; ! § 123c
!!  d+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:d  # ; ! § 123d
!!  e+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:e  # ; ! § 123e
!!  š+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:š  # ;
!
!!+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:      # ;
!!+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:      # ;
! +Arab+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:a     # ; ! But here 123a 123
! +Arab+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:a     # ;
! +Arab+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:ža    # ;
! +Arab+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:ža    # ;
! +Arab+Sg+Ill+Use/NG:%>i     # ;
! +Arab+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:ij    # ;
! +Arab+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:žij   # ;
! +Arab+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:áj    # ; ! Testing over the weekend. !
! +Arab+Sg+Loc:%>s            K ;
! +Arab+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:is    K ;
! +Arab+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:žis   K ;
! +Arab+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:as    # ;
! +Arab+Sg+Com:%>in           # ;
! +Arab+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:žijn  # ;
! +Arab+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:ain   # ;
! +Arab+Sg+Ess:%>n            # ;
! +Arab+Sg+Ess+Err/Orth:žin   # ;
! +Arab+Sg+Ess+Err/Orth:an    # ;
! +Arab+Pl+Nom:%>t            K ;
! +Arab+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:ijd9  K ;
! +Arab+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:%>id9   K ;
! +Arab+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:ijd9  K ;
! +Arab+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:%>id9   K ;
! +Arab+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:ijde  K ; ! 100:iide čuđiide
! +Arab+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:ijdda K ; ! 1000:idda duháhiidda
! +Arab+Pl+Ill+Use/NG:%>ide   K ; ! 100:iide čuđiide
! +Arab+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:idda  K ; ! 1000:idda duháhiidda
! +Arab+Pl+Loc:%>in           K ;
! +Arab+Pl+Com:%>igujn        K ;
!
 LEXICON ARABICCASEORD_Back   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ordinals Is this then becoming +Ex/A?
 +Arab+N:%>ш%{оы%}  N-continuation ;
 +Err/Orth+Arab+N:%>ш%{еы%}  N-continuation ;
 +Err/Orth+Arab+N:%>ш%{ӧы%}  N-continuation ;
 LEXICON ARABICCASEORD_Front   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ordinals
 +Arab+N:%>ш%{еы%}  N-continuation ;
 +Err/Orth+Arab+N:%>ш%{оы%}  N-continuation ;
 +Err/Orth+Arab+N:%>ш%{ӧы%}  N-continuation ;
 LEXICON ARABICCASEORD_FrontRound   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ordinals
 +Arab+N:%>ш%{ӧы%}  N-continuation ;
 +Err/Orth+Arab+N:%>ш%{оы%}  N-continuation ;
 +Err/Orth+Arab+N:%>ш%{еы%}  N-continuation ;

! LEXICON ARABICCASECOLL   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ collectives
! +Arab+Sg+Nom:%>s    K ;
! +Arab+Sg+Gen:%>sa   K ;
! +Arab+Sg+Acc:%>sa   K ;
! +Arab+Sg+Ill:%>sij  K ;
! +Arab+Sg+Loc:%>sis  K ;
! +Arab+Sg+Com:%>sijn K ;
!

!LEXICON ROMNUMTAGOBL   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
! +Rom+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%>a  # ; !  But here 123a 123
! +Rom+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%>a  # ; !
!          +Rom+Sg+Ill+Use/Circ:%>i  # ; !
! +Rom+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%>ij # ; !
! +Rom+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%>áj # ; !
!          +Rom+Sg+Loc+Use/Circ:%>s  # ; !
!          +Rom+Sg+Com+Use/Circ:%>in # ; !
!             +Rom+Ess+Use/Circ:%>n  # ; !
!
